Maryland, session 2025, SB0536.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0536*

SENATE BILL 536
Title 15. Research Facilities [that] AND TESTING FACILITIES THAT Use [Dogs or Cats]
ANIMALS.
15–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “ALTERNATIVE TEST METHOD” MEANS A TEST METHOD,
INCLUDING A NEW OR REVISED METHOD, THAT:
(I) DOES NOT USE ANIMALS;
(II) PRODUCES INFORMATION OF EQUIVALENT OR BETTER
SCIENTIFIC QUALITY AND RELEVANCE COMPARED TO TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST
METHODS; AND
(III) HAS BEEN IDENTIFIED AND ACCEPTED FOR USE BY THE
FEDERAL AGENCY OR PROGRAM WITHIN THE FEDERAL AGENCY RESPONSIBLE FOR
REGULATING THE SPECIFIC PRODUCT OR ACTIVITY FOR WHICH THE TEST IS BEING
CONDUCTED.
(2) “ALTERNATIVE TEST METHOD” INCLUDES:
(I) COMPUTATIONAL TOXICOLOGY AND BIOINFORMATICS;
(II) HIGH–THROUGHPUT SCREENING METHODS;
(III) TESTING CATEGORIES OF CHEMICAL SUBSTANCES;
(IV) TIERED TESTING METHODS;
(V) IN VITRO STUDIES; AND
(VI) SYSTEMS BIOLOGY.
(C) (1) “BIOMEDICAL RESEARCH” MEANS:
(I) THE INVESTIGATION OF THE BIOLOGICAL PROCESSES AND
CAUSES OF DISEASE; OR

SENATE BILL 536 3
(II) RESEARCH CONDUCTED TO INCREASE FUNDAMENTAL
SCIENTIFIC KNOWLEDGE AND EXPAND THE UNDERSTANDING OF HOW PROCESSES IN
LIVING ORGANISMS DEVELOP AND FUNCTION.
(2) “BIOMEDICAL RESEARCH” DOES NOT INCLUDE TESTING DONE TO
ASSESS THE SAFETY OR EFFICACY OF:
(I) CHEMICAL SUBSTANCES;
(II) INGREDIENTS;
(III) DRUGS;
(IV) VACCINES;
(V) PRODUCTS; OR
(VI) PRODUCT FORMULATIONS.
(D) “CANINE OR FELINE TOXICOLOGICAL EXPERIMENT” MEANS A TEST OR
STUDY USED TO DETERMINE THE EFFECT OF THE APPLICATION OR EXPOSURE,
WHETHER INTERNAL OR EXTERNAL AND INCLUDING ORAL INGESTION, SKIN OR EYE
CONTACT, AND INHALATION, OF ANY AMOUNT OF A CHEMICAL SUBSTANCE ON A DOG
OR CAT.
(E) “CHEMICAL SUBSTANCE” MEANS ANY ORGANIC OR INORGANIC
SUBSTANCE INCLUDING:
(1) A DRUG AS DEFINED IN 21 U.S.C. § 321(G);
(2) A PESTICIDE AS DEFINED IN 7 U.S.C. § 136(U);
(3) A CHEMICAL SUBSTANCE AS DEFINED IN 15 U.S.C. § 2602(2); AND
(4) A FOOD ADDITIVE AS DEFINED IN 21 U.S.C. § 321(S).
(F) (1) “RESEARCH FACILITY” MEANS ANY FACILITY IN THE STATE THAT
USES ANIMALS FOR RESEARCH, EDUCATION, OR EXPERIMENTATION.
(2) “RESEARCH FACILITY” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) A PARTNERSHIP, A CORPORATION, AN ASSOCIATION, AN
INSTITUTION, AN ORGANIZATION, OR ANY OTHER ENTITY IN THE STATE THAT

SENATE BILL 536
PROVIDES ONLY BENEFICIAL SERVICES TO AN ANIMAL SUCH AS SPAYING AND
NEUTERING; OR
(II) A SCHOOL OR AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION.
(G) (1) “TESTING FACILITY” MEANS A PUBLIC OR PRIVATE
PARTNERSHIP, CORPORATION, ASSOCIATION, ORGANIZATION, OR ANY OTHER
ENTITY IN THE STATE THAT USES ANIMALS FOR THE TESTING OF:
(I) CHEMICAL SUBSTANCES;
(II) INGREDIENTS;
(III) DRUGS;
(IV) VACCINES;
(V) PRODUCTS; OR
(VI) PRODUCT FORMULATIONS.
(2) “TESTING FACILITY” INCLUDES A PARTNERSHIP, A
CORPORATION, AN ASSOCIATION, AN ORGANIZATION, OR ANY OTHER ENTITY IN THE
STATE THAT IS OWNED, LEASED, OR OPERATED BY A PUBLIC OR PRIVATE ENTITY.
(3) “TESTING FACILITY” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) A PARTNERSHIP, A CORPORATION, AN ASSOCIATION, AN
INSTITUTION, AN ORGANIZATION, OR ANY OTHER ENTITY IN THE STATE THAT
PROVIDES ONLY BENEFICIAL SERVICES TO AN ANIMAL SUCH AS SPAYING AND
NEUTERING; OR
(II) A SCHOOL OR AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION.
(H) “TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST METHOD” MEANS A PROCESS, AN
EXPERIMENT, OR A PROCEDURE THAT:
(1) USES ANIMALS TO OBTAIN INFORMATION ON THE
CHARACTERISTICS OF A CHEMICAL SUBSTANCE, AN INGREDIENT, A DRUG, A
VACCINE, A PRODUCT FORMULATION, OR A PRODUCT; AND
(2) GENERATES INFORMATION REGARDING THE ABILITY OF THE
CHEMICAL SUBSTANCE, INGREDIENT, DRUG, VACCINE, PRODUCT FORMULATION, OR

SENATE BILL 536 5
PRODUCT TO PRODUCE A SPECIFIC BIOLOGICAL EFFECT UNDER SPECIFIED
CONDITIONS.
15–102.
(A) EACH RESEARCH FACILITY AND TESTING FACILITY SHALL ENSURE THAT
THE NUMBER OF DOGS AND CATS USED FOR RESEARCH OR TESTING PURPOSES NOT
OTHERWISE PROHIBITED UNDER THIS TITLE IS REDUCED TO THE SMALLEST
NUMBER POSSIBLE BY USING SCIENTIFICALLY RELIABLE AND RELEVANT METHODS
THAT DO NOT INVOLVE THE USE OF DOGS OR CATS.
(B) A RESEARCH FACILITY OR TESTING FACILITY MAY NOT USE FOR
RESEARCH OR TESTING PURPOSES:
(1) A DOG SOLD BY A CLASS B DEALER LICENSED UNDER THE
FEDERAL ANIMAL WELFARE ACT;
(2) A DOG OR CAT OBTAINED FROM A PERSON THAT DID NOT BREED
AND RAISE THE DOG OR CAT, INCLUDING A DOG OR CAT OBTAINED FROM AN
AUCTION, A FLEA MARKET, OR AN ANIMAL SHELTER; OR
(3) A DOG OR CAT THAT HAS UNDERGONE A DEVOCALIZATION
SURGERY.
(C) A RESEARCH FACILITY OR TESTING FACILITY MAY NOT PERFORM A
DEVOCALIZATION SURGERY ON A DOG OR CAT.
(D) A DOG OR CAT AT A RESEARCH FACILITY OR TESTING FACILITY MAY BE
EUTHANIZED ONLY BY A LETHAL INJECTION OF SODIUM PENTOBARBITAL
ADMINISTERED:
(1) BY A VETERINARIAN LICENSED IN THE STATE; OR
(2) UNDER THE DIRECT SUPERVISION OF A VETERINARIAN LICENSED
IN THE STATE.
15–103.
(A) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A RESEARCH
FACILITY OR TESTING FACILITY MAY NOT USE A TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST
METHOD IF THE AGENCY RESPONSIBLE FOR REGULATING THE SPECIFIC PRODUCT
OR ACTIVITY FOR WHICH A TEST METHOD IS BEING USED HAS:

SENATE BILL 536
(I) APPROVED AN ALTERNATIVE TEST METHOD; OR
(II) GRANTED THE RESEARCH FACILITY OR TESTING FACILITY
A WAIVER FROM USING A TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST METHOD.
(2) IF THERE IS NO ALTERNATIVE TEST METHOD AVAILABLE OR
WAIVER GRANTED, A RESEARCH FACILITY OR TESTING FACILITY MAY USE A
TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST METHOD IF THE RESEARCH FACILITY OR TESTING
FACILITY USES THE FEWEST NUMBER OF ANIMALS POSSIBLE AND MINIMIZES THE
LEVEL OF PAIN, SUFFERING, AND STRESS OF AN ANIMAL USED FOR TESTING.
(3) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT
THE USE OF A TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST METHOD TO COMPLY WITH FEDERAL OR
STATE REQUIREMENTS IF THE APPROPRIATE FEDERAL OR STATE AGENCY HAS
APPROVED THE USE OF AN ALTERNATIVE TEST METHOD BUT DETERMINED THAT
THE ALTERNATIVE TEST METHOD DOES NOT ENSURE THE HEALTH OR SAFETY OF
THE PUBLIC OR THE ENVIRONMENT.
(B) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO BIOMEDICAL RESEARCH.
(2) A RESEARCH FACILITY OR TESTING FACILITY MAY NOT CONDUCT
A CANINE OR FELINE TOXICOLOGICAL EXPERIMENT IN THE STATE FOR DISCOVERY,
APPROVAL, MAINTENANCE OF APPROVAL, NOTIFICATION, REGISTRATION, OR
MAINTENANCE OF A CHEMICAL SUBSTANCE UNLESS THE CANINE OR FELINE
TOXICOLOGICAL EXPERIMENT IS CONDUCTED TO:
(I) SATISFY AN EXPRESS REQUIREMENT IMPOSED BY THE U.S.
ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY UNDER THE AUTHORITY OF THE FEDERAL
INSECTICIDE, FUNGICIDE, AND RODENTICIDE ACT OR THE FEDERAL TOXIC
SUBSTANCES CONTROL ACT;
(II) SATISFY AN EXPRESS REQUIREMENT IMPOSED BY THE U.S.
FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION UNDER THE AUTHORITY OF THE FEDERAL
FOOD, DRUG, AND COSMETIC ACT IF THE RESEARCH FACILITY OR TESTING
FACILITY:
1. SUBMITS A PRE–INVESTIGATIONAL NEW DRUG
APPLICATION MEETING REQUEST TO THE U.S. FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION
TO RECEIVE GUIDANCE ON WHETHER ALL PROPOSED CANINE OR FELINE
TOXICOLOGICAL EXPERIMENTS ARE NECESSARY TO SUPPORT THE RESEARCH
FACILITY’S OR TESTING FACILITY’S PLANNED CLINICAL TRIALS; AND

SENATE BILL 536 7
2. IS NOT EXPRESSLY DIRECTED BY THE U.S. FOOD AND
DRUG ADMINISTRATION TO USE AN ALTERNATIVE TEST METHOD;
(III) SUPPORT AN APPLICATION TO THE U.S. ENVIRONMENTAL
PROTECTION AGENCY FOR A WAIVER FROM THE USE OF A CANINE OR FELINE
TOXICOLOGICAL EXPERIMENT IF THE EXPERIMENT IS CONDUCTED SOLELY FOR THE
PURPOSE OF REDUCING THE TOTAL NUMBER OF ANIMALS NEEDED FOR
EXPERIMENTS TO ACHIEVE DISCOVERY, APPROVAL, MAINTENANCE OF APPROVAL,
NOTIFICATION, REGISTRATION, OR MAINTENANCE OF A CHEMICAL SUBSTANCE; OR
(IV) DEVELOP, MANUFACTURE, OR MARKET A PRODUCT
INTENDED FOR THE BENEFICIAL USE OF DOGS OR CATS.
[15–101.] 15–104.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Animal rescue organization” includes:
(i) A nonprofit organization incorporated for the purpose of rescuing
animals in need and finding permanent adoptive homes for the animals; and
(ii) A government–operated animal control unit that provides
animals for adoption.
(3) [“Research facility” includes:
(i) A higher education research facility;
(ii) A scientific research facility;
(iii) A medical research facility; and
(iv) A product testing facility.
(4)] “Scientific research purposes” includes:
(i) Investigation;
(ii) Experimentation;
(iii) Instruction; and
(iv) Testing.

SENATE BILL 536
(b) This section applies to a dog or cat that, in the determination of an attending
veterinarian, is suitable for adoption.
(c) A research facility OR TESTING FACILITY located in the State in which dogs
or cats are used for scientific research purposes shall take reasonable steps to provide for
the adoption of a dog or cat that, in the determination of the research facility OR TESTING
FACILITY, is no longer needed for scientific research purposes by:
(1) Establishing a private placement process to provide for the adoption of
a dog or cat;
(2) Establishing a list of animal rescue organizations that are approved by
the research facility OR TESTING FACILITY and are willing to take a dog or cat from the
research facility OR TESTING FACILITY; and
(3) Offering the dog or cat to the animal rescue organizations identified in
the list established under item (2) of this subsection if the research facility OR TESTING
FACILITY is unable to place the dog or cat through its private placement process.
(d) A research facility OR TESTING FACILITY may enter into a collaborative
agreement with an animal rescue organization for the purpose of carrying out the
provisions of this section.
15–105.
(A) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 31 EACH YEAR, EACH RESEARCH FACILITY
AND TESTING FACILITY SHALL SUBMIT TO THE SECRETARY THE FOLLOWING
INFORMATION REGARDING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING 12–MONTH PERIOD:
(1) THE NUMBER OF EACH SPECIES OF ANIMALS OWNED AND USED BY
THE RESEARCH FACILITY OR TESTING FACILITY;
(2) THE NUMBER OF DOGS OR CATS RELEASED TO ANIMAL RESCUE
ORGANIZATIONS UNDER § 15–104 OF THIS TITLE AND THE NAMES OF THE ANIMAL
RESCUE ORGANIZATIONS TO WHICH THE DOGS OR CATS WERE RELEASED;
(3) THE TYPE AND NUMBER OF ALTERNATIVE TEST METHODS AND
TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST METHODS USED;
(4) THE NUMBER OF TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST METHOD WAIVERS
AND CANINE OR FELINE TOXICOLOGICAL EXPERIMENT WAIVERS USED; AND
(5) THE PURPOSE OF ANY TESTS CONDUCTED USING ALTERNATIVE
TEST METHODS OR TRADITIONAL ANIMAL TEST METHODS.

SENATE BILL 536 9
(B) THE SECRETARY SHALL:
(1) PREPARE AN ANNUAL REPORT AGGREGATING THE INFORMATION
SUBMITTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(2) POST THE ANNUAL REPORT ON THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE.
15–106.
A RESEARCH FACILITY OR TESTING FACILITY THAT VIOLATES THIS TITLE IS
SUBJECT TO:
(1) FOR A FIRST OFFENSE, A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $1,000; AND
(2) FOR A SECOND OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE, A FINE NOT
EXCEEDING $5,000.
15–107.
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO:
(1) CARRY OUT THIS TITLE; AND
(2) ENSURE THE HUMANE TREATMENT AND CARE OF DOGS AND CATS
THAT ARE USED FOR RESEARCH, EDUCATION, OR TESTING CONSISTENT WITH THE
FEDERAL ANIMAL WELFARE ACT AND CORRESPONDING REGULATIONS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.